District of Columbia statutes.
43-105

Duty to inclose and underdrain.

It shall be the duty of the owner or owners of any cemetery or cemeteries in the District to inclose such cemetery or cemeteries with good and sufficient walls or fences to prevent entrance thereto or exit therefrom except by gates provided for that purpose. Such cemetery or cemeteries shall, if required by the Mayor of said District, be underdrained to such a depth as will prevent water remaining in any grave or vault therein.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1295, ch. 854, § 671
1981 Ed., § 27-105.
1973 Ed., § 27-105.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.